South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3473.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 48-14-40(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) Land disturbing activities on agricultural land for production of plants and animals useful to man, including but not limited to:  forages and sod crops, grains and feed crops, tobacco, cotton, and peanuts;  dairy animals and dairy products;  poultry and poultry products;  livestock, including beef cattle, sheep, swine, horses, ponies, mules, or goats, including the breeding and grazing of these animals;  bees and dairy products;  fur animals and aquaculture,; agricultural structures used to house livestock, poultry, crops, or other agricultural products, materials, or equipment; except that the construction of other types ofan agricultural structure structures of one or more acres, such as broiler houses, machine sheds, repair shops, and other major buildings and which require the issuance of a building permit shall require the submittal and approval of a stormwater management and sediment control plan prior to the start of the land disturbing activity. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----